Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-902
Migratory bird reservations; federal establishment; state's consent.

Consent of the State of Nebraska is given to the acquisition by the United States by purchase, gift, devise, or lease of such areas of land or water, or of land and water, in the State of Nebraska, as the United States may deem necessary for the establishment of migratory bird reservations in accordance with the Act of Congress approved February 18, 1929, entitled An Act to more effectively meet the obligations of the United States under the Migratory Bird Treaty with Great Britain by lessening the dangers threatening migratory game birds from drainage and other causes by the acquisition of areas of land and of water to furnish in perpetuity reservations for the adequate protection of such birds; and authorizing appropriations for the establishment of such areas, their maintenance and improvement and for other purposes, reserving, however, to the State of Nebraska full and complete jurisdiction and authority over all such areas not incompatible with the administration, maintenance, protection, and control thereof by the United States under the terms of the Act of Congress.

Laws 1929, c. 118, § 1, p. 455;

C.S.1929, § 37-422;

R.S.1943, § 37-423;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-423;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 363.